skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ-.</alphabet>

<sdefs>
<!--Text-->
<sdef n="vargaH:nA" c="Noun"/>

<sdef n="lifgam:puM" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="lifgam:swrI" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="lifgam:napuM" c="neuter"/>

<sdef n="vacanam:eka" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="vacanam:xvi" c="dual"/>
<sdef n="vacanam:bahu" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="viBakwiH:1" c="1"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:2" c="2"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:3" c="3"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:4" c="4"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:5" c="5"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:6" c="6"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:7" c="7"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:8" c="8"/>

<sdef n="level:1" c="1"/>

</sdefs>

<pardefs>

<pardef n="/h__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>x</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ham</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hA</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dBiH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>he</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByaH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>dByaH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hoH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hi</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hoH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="/Ax__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>x</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxO</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Axam</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxO</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aXA</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxByAm</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxBiH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axe</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxByAm</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxByaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxByAm</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxByaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axoH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axAm</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axi</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>axoH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Atsu</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ax</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxO</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AxaH</l><r>Ax<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/Ax__nm"/></e>
    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/h__nm"/></e>
